Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.231

Limitations on distribution.

(1) A limited liability company must not make a distribution in violation of the limited liability company agreement.

(2) A limited liability company must not make a distribution to the extent that at the time of the distribution, after giving effect to the distribution (a) the limited liability company would not be able to pay its debts as they became due in the usual course of its activities, or (b) all liabilities of the limited liability company, other than liabilities to members on account of their limited liability company interests and liabilities for which the recourse of creditors is limited to specified property of the limited liability company, exceed the fair value of the assets of the limited liability company, except that the fair value of property that is subject to a liability for which the recourse of creditors is limited is included in the assets of the limited liability company only to the extent that the fair value of that property exceeds that liability.

(3) A limited liability company may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (2) of this section on financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances or on a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable in the circumstances.

(4) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section, the effect of a distribution under subsection (2) of this section is measured:

(a) In the case of distribution by purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of a transferable interest in the limited liability company, as of the date money or other property is transferred or debt incurred by the limited liability company; and

(b) In all other cases, as of the date:

(i) The distribution is authorized, if the payment occurs within one hundred twenty days after that date; or

(ii) The payment is made, if payment occurs more than one hundred twenty days after the distribution is authorized.

(5) A limited liability company's indebtedness to a member incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section is at parity with the limited liability company's indebtedness to its general, unsecured creditors.

(6) A limited liability company's indebtedness, including indebtedness issued in connection with or as part of a distribution, is not considered a liability for purposes of subsection (2) of this section if the terms of the indebtedness provide that payment of principal and interest are made only to the extent that a distribution could then be made to members under this section.

(7) The effect of a distribution of indebtedness under subsection (2) of this section is measured:

(a) In the case of a distribution of indebtedness described in subsection (6) of this section, each payment of principal or interest is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is actually made; and

(b) In the case of a distribution of any other indebtedness, the effect of the distribution is measured as of the date the indebtedness is distributed.

[ 2015 c 188 s 46.]